Missouri, session 2026, SB842.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 191.945, to read as
follows:
191.945. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as "Cindi's Law".
2. All abnormal cytological or histological
endometrial samples shall, in addition to any other testing,
include a p53 test for purposes of diagnosis and treatment
of uterine cancer.
3. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Endometrial sampling", a procedure to collect
tissue from the uterine lining for diagnostic purposes;
(2) "p53 test", a test used to detect the presence and
pattern of abnormalities in the p53 protein in tissue
samples, which indicate the invasiveness, severity, and
prognosis for various cancers.
✓